DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULICBRAKEBOOSTERPOWER

DI-339

SUPPLY SYSTEM
DTC C1241 /41 IG Power Source Circuit
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1241/ 41

Detection ofany ofconditions (1) through (4):

(1) Vehiclespeedis3km/h( 1.9 mph) ormoreand
voltage of ECU terminal IG remains at below 9.5 V for
morethan 10secs.

(2) While the condition that the solenoid relay is ON
continues, ECUterminal IG 1 voltagebecomes9.5V
or less, and the condition that the contact point of the
solenoid relay is OFF continues for 0.2 secs. or more.

(8) The conditionthatECUterminalIG 1 voltageismore
than 18.5V continues.

(4) While the solenoid relay outputs ON signal, ECU
terminalIG 1 voltagebecomes9.5 - 18.5V,and
the condition that the contact point of the solenoid
relay is OFF continues for 0.2 secs. or more.

* Battery
«ICregulator
e Power source circuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the power source circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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DI-340 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER

SUPPLY SYSTEM
WIRING DIAGRAM
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DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-341
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbattery voltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 - 14V

@

2 | Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

NG> Check and repair the charging system.

INCASEOFUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

PREPARATION:

(a) Connectthehand -heldtestertothe DLCS.

(b) Turntheignition switch ON and pushthe hand -heldtester main switch ON.

(c) Selectthe DATALIST mode onthe hand -heldtester.

CHECK:

Checkthe voltage condition output from the ECU displayed onthe hand -heldtester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

INCASEOFNOTUSINGHAND -HELDTESTER:

ON PREPARATION:
@ G GND GND Remove ABS ECU with connectors still connected.

CHECK:

'u uj; (@) Turn the ignition switch ON.

(L LD (b) Measure voltage betweenterminalsIG 1 and GND of ABS
ECU connector.

OK:

) Voltage: 10 - 14V

e ]
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F04451
0K> Ignition switch OFF, check and replace ABS
ECU.
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DI-342 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

3 | Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS ECU connector and body
ground.

LOCK GND CHECK:
® / \ Measure resistance between terminal GND of ABS ECU con-

[TTTTTTT|p IIII\IIIIv nectorandbodyground.
Gl R OK:
Resistance: 1 Q or less

F04452

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

4 Check ECU-IG fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove ECU-IG fuse from driver’s side J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of ECU-IG fuse.
OK:
Continuity

Driver’s Side J/B

ECU-IG

components connected to ECU-IG fuse (See at-

F04448 NG Check for short circuit in all the harness and
tached wiring diagram).

@

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS ECU and battery.
(See page IN-24)
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